Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 670. HUMAN RESOURCES STAFFING AND FUNCTIONS

Sec. 670.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Human resources employee" does not include an employee whose primary job function is enforcement of Title VI or Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.

(2) "State agency" means a department, commission, board, office, authority, council, or other governmental entity in the executive branch of government that is created by the constitution or a statute of this state and has authority not limited to a geographical portion of the state. The term does not include a university system or institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 670.002. HUMAN RESOURCES STAFFING FOR LARGE STATE AGENCIES. A state agency with 500 or more full-time equivalent employees shall adjust the agency's human resources staff to achieve a human resources employee-to-staff ratio of not more than one human resources employee for every 85 staff members.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 15(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.